Wyoming, session 2025, SF0083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-25-101 and 9-25-102 are created to
read:

CHAPTER 25
LARGE ENERGY PROJECT FUNDING
SF0083

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0319

9-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Awarding entity" means any state or local
governmental entity that awards, grants or loans state
funds for large energy projects;

(ii) "Energy project" means any research,
demonstration, pilot, commercial deployment or any other
project that relates to Wyoming energy needs, including but
not limited to carbon capture utilization and storage,
carbon dioxide transportation, industrial carbon capture,
coal refinery, hydrogen production, energy transportation
or storage, hydrogen hub development, critical minerals,
biomass, biochar, hydropower, lithium, energy processing
and separation, battery storage, wind energy and solar
energy;

(iii) "Governmental entity" means the state, the
University of Wyoming, cities and towns, counties, school
districts, joint powers boards, airport boards, public
SF0083

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0319
corporations, entities formed by a county memorial
hospital, special hospital district, rural health care
district or senior health care district that are wholly
owned by one (1) or more governmental entities, community
college districts, special districts and their governing
bodies, all political subdivisions of the state, and their
agencies, instrumentalities and institutions;

(iv) "Large energy project" means an energy
project for which the total amount of state funds sought or
previously awarded equals or exceeds four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000.00);

(v) "State funds" means any funds appropriated
or otherwise made available by the state legislature for
energy projects.

9-25-102. Large energy projects; approval.

(a) Not later than November 1 of each year, each
awarding entity shall report to the joint appropriations
committee on awards of state funds for large energy
projects, including:
SF0083

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0319

(i) The name of each applicant for and recipient
of state funds for a proposed large energy project;

(ii) The amount of state funds recommended by
the awarding entity to be awarded to each recipient for
large energy projects;

(iii) Whether any matching funds are or will be
provided in addition to the state funds to be awarded for
large energy projects;

(iv) The amount of state funds awarded and
expended for large energy projects in the preceding fiscal
year, by large energy project and recipient, for which
approval was authorized under subsection (b) of this
section.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, no state
funds shall be expended for large energy projects except
upon legislative authorization or as authorized in this
subsection. Following legislative authorization for an
awarding entity to award state funds for a large energy
SF0083

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0319
project, the awarding entity may award additional state
funds for that large energy project not to exceed a total
of an additional two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00)
and shall forward a notice of the award of additional state
funds to the joint appropriations committee not later than
thirty (30) days after each award of additional state
funds. Subsequent legislative authorization shall be
required for any award of state funds for the specific
large energy project in excess of the limits of this
subsection. For purposes of this subsection, legislative
authorization shall be through the enactment of a bill.

Section 2. W.S. 9-12-104 by creating a new subsection
(c) and 37-5-503 by creating a new subsection (k) are
amended to read:

9-12-104. General powers and duties of the council.

(c) The council shall comply with W.S. 9-25-101 and
9-25-102 before awarding, granting or lending any funds
under this act for large energy projects as defined by W.S.
9-25-101(a)(iii).

SF0083

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0319
37-5-503. Purposes; report.

(k) The authority shall comply with W.S. 9-25-101 and
9-25-102 before awarding, granting or lending any funds for
large energy projects as defined by W.S. 9-25-101(a)(iii).

Section 3. This act shall apply to all large energy
projects for which the legislature appropriates state funds
on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0083